Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,215
Local emergency planning committee; members; terms.

The Nebraska Emergency Management Agency shall appoint the members of each local emergency planning committee for each emergency planning district established after September 13, 1997. Only one local emergency planning committee shall be established in each district. To the extent possible, each committee established prior to, on, or after September 13, 1997, shall include at a minimum a representative from each of the following interest groups: State and local elected officials, public health, local environmental protection, hospitals, firefighters, local emergency management, law enforcement, transportation, broadcast and print media, neighborhood and community organizations, and owners and operators of facilities which are subject to the requirements of the Nebraska Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act. The committee members shall be appointed for terms of two years, except that of the initial appointees, approximately one-half of the members shall serve for terms of one year as designated at the time of appointment. A vacancy on a committee shall exist in the event of the death, disability, or resignation of a member. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which his or her predecessor was appointed shall be appointed for the remainder of such term.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 25;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 49.
July 1, 2026